Hawaii statutes.
[§103-12] Capital improvement projects;
personnel training; management. (a) The comptroller shall conduct annual
training for the engineering personnel of all executive departments and state
agencies that manage their own capital improvement projects to ensure
compliance with state adopted standards and procedures of best practices in the
management and construction of capital improvement projects. Each department
and agency shall provide orientation training for new employees subject to this
subsection and who are hired during the interim between annual trainings.

(b) All executive departments and state
agencies that manage their own capital improvement projects shall:

(1) Use timelines that include a comprehensive list
of all activities required on a project, and not simply rely on contractor
timelines, which may not reflect all project phases. At a minimum, the list
shall include all phases in a project's life cycle, namely, the initiation,
planning, design, bid, construction, and post construction phases;

(2) Follow state procurement office guidance for
tracking payments and deliverables by using a contract administration worksheet
that includes milestones or deliverables, which are marked off as items are
completed; and

(3) To help ensure end-user satisfaction with their
capital improvement projects, identify and involve stakeholders throughout a
project's execution and closing, including providing information about project
costs, schedules, and performance. [L 2016, c 241, §2]

Note

Department of accounting and general services; status report
to 2017 legislature on implementation of practices required by L 2016, c 241.
L 2016, c 241, §3.

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next